Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4285.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1163a. (1) By not later than September 1, 2025, the department, in consultation with the department of natural resources, shall adopt and make available to schools a model program of firearm safety instruction for students in grades 6 to 12. The instruction must comply with the requirements of the safe firearm handling course provided by the department of natural resources under section 43543 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.43543, and must be taught by an individual who has been certified as a hunter education instructor by the department of natural resources. The firearm safety instruction must include, but is not limited to, the following topics: (a) Proper usage and handling of firearms. (b) Safe cleaning and maintenance of firearms. (c) Different types of firearms. (d) Safe hunting practices. (2) Firearms or ammunition must not be brought into a school building as part of the firearm safety instruction. (3) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy may provide the firearm safety instruction as an optional extracurricular class for any pupil in grades 6 to 12 in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or may provide the firearm safety instruction as part of an existing course for the purpose of teaching self-expression and enjoyment of recreational activity. (4) Upon request from a pupil or the pupils parent or legal guardian, the pupil must be excused, without penalty or loss of academic credit, from attending the firearm safety instruction. (5) A pupil who completes the firearm safety instruction is considered to have completed the hunter safety course required to obtain a hunting license under section 43520 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.43520. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor